Arkansas statutes. Title 1 General Provisions
Chapter 2

The Code and Regulations

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 1989, No. 990 formally codified the legislation from the 1987 Regular Session, the 1987 First and Second Extraordinary Sessions, and the 1988 Third and Fourth Extraordinary Sessions. All codified acts appearing in the acts disposition table (see Tables volumes) for those sessions were formally codified by the act.

Acts 1989, No. 990, §§ 1-12, provided:

“SECTION 1.

The Arkansas Code sections following section 12 of this Act are amendments or new provisions enacted by the Arkansas General Assembly during the regular and extraordinary sessions of the 76th General Assembly. It is the purpose of this Act to adopt and enact the revision and codification of these enactments as prepared by the Arkansas Code Revision Commission for formal inclusion as part of the Arkansas Code of 1987.

“SECTION 2.(a)

It is the intent of the General Assembly that this Act be a codification, revision, modernization, and reenactment of the laws of Arkansas of a general and permanent nature adopted at the regular session and the 1st, 2nd, 3rd, and 4th extraordinary sessions of the 76th General Assembly which are currently in force.

“(b)

It is the intent of the General Assembly that this Act resolve conflicts which exist in the laws and to repeal those laws which have been superseded by the enactment of later laws.

“(c)

Except as otherwise specifically provided, the enactment of this Act by the General Assembly is not intended to alter the substantive law or change or alter the effect of any law in existence on December 31, 1988.

“SECTION 3.

This Act shall be merged with annotations, captions, catchlines, history lines, editorial notes, cross references, indices, title, chapter and subchapter analyses, and other materials pursuant to the contract entered into on August 1, 1984, between the Arkansas Code Revision Commission and The Michie Company of Charlottesville, Virginia.

“SECTION 4.(a)

All acts, all parts of acts, and all amendments to acts, of a general and permanent nature in effect on December 31, 1988, enacted by the 76th Arkansas General Assembly, except Act 267 of 1987, the Arkansas Code of 1987, are repealed unless:

“(1)

Expressly continued by specific provision of this Act or other law;

“(2)

Omitted improperly or erroneously as a consequence of compilation, revision, or both, of the laws comprising this Act; or

“(3)

Omitted, changed, or modified by the Arkansas Code Revision Commission in a manner not authorized by the laws or the Constitution of Arkansas in effect at the time of the omission, change, or modification.

“(b)

In the event one of the above exceptions should be applicable, the law as it existed on December 31, 1988, shall continue to be valid, effective, and controlling, except as otherwise provided by any act of the 77th General Assembly.

“(c)

The adoption of this Act shall not be construed to repeal any act or section or part of a section of an act in effect on December 31, 1988, and omitted from this act, which:

“(1)

Is of a local or special nature;

“(2)

Relates to or applies to only one (1) county, municipality, political subdivision, district, or territory;

“(3)

Applies to one (1) or more counties, municipalities, political subdivisions, districts, or territories on the basis of population;

“(4)

Applies to one (1) or more counties, municipalities, political subdivisions, districts, or territories on the basis of the number of counties, municipalities, political subdivisions, districts, or territories;

“(5)

Applies to one (1) or more judicial districts or one (1) or more counties within a judicial district, whether by specific reference thereto or by some other method of identification or classification;

“(6)

Establishes the amount or rate of salary or compensation of any state officer or employee or any other person whose salary or compensation is paid by this state, in whole or in part, or which establishes minimum or maximum amounts or sets specific amounts of salary or compensation or which provides additional compensation for the performance of specified services or duties; or

“(7)

Appropriates funds from any source.

“(d)

The enactment and adoption of this Act shall not affect or repeal the acts passed at the regular session of the 77th General Assembly. All such acts shall have full effect and, so far as those acts vary from or conflict with any provision contained in this Act, they shall have the effect of subsequent acts and as amending, repealing, or adding to the Arkansas Code of 1987.

“SECTION 5.

The adoption of this Act shall not validate an act or validate any section or part of a section of an act, which act or section or part of a section of an act is constitutionally invalid.

“SECTION 6.

Unless otherwise provided, the adoption of this Act shall not invalidate or affect any rules or regulations which are in effect on July 1, 1989, promulgated pursuant to authority given by law. These rules and regulations shall remain in force until repealed, replaced, or invalidated.

“SECTION 7.(a)

The adoption of this Act shall not affect or impair any existing right, remedy, or defense nor affect, impair, discharge, or release any existing contract, obligation, duty, or liability of any kind. It shall not affect any pending suit or action, or prosecution now commenced or which shall be hereafter commenced, for any offense committed prior to the effective date of this Act. As to all such suits, actions, and prosecutions, the law in force on December 31, 1988, shall continue in force, except as otherwise provided by any other act of the 77th General Assembly.

“(b)

The repeal, repeal and reenactment, or the revision, amendment, or consolidation of any act, or of any section or part of a section of any act, civil or criminal, shall not release, extinguish, alter, modify, or change, in whole or in part, any penalty, forfeiture, or liability, either civil or criminal, which shall have been incurred under the act, section, or part thereof unless the repealing, repealing and reenacting, revising, amending, or consolidating act shall expressly so provide. The repealed, repealed and reenacted, revised, amended, or consolidated act, or any section or part of a section of that act, shall be treated and held as still remaining in force for the purpose of sustaining any and all suits, actions, or prosecutions, civil or criminal, for the enforcement of any penalty, forfeiture, or liability, as well as for the purpose of sustaining any judgment, decree, or order which can or may be rendered, entered, or made in such suits, actions, or prosecutions imposing, inflicting, or declaring a penalty, forfeiture, or liability.

“SECTION 8.

When a limitation or period of time prescribed in any act in effect on December 31, 1988, for acquiring a right, barring a remedy, or for any other purpose has begun to run before July 1, 1989, and when a limitation or period of time is prescribed in this Act for acquiring the right, barring the remedy, or for any other purpose, then the time which has already run shall be deemed to be part of the time prescribed by the limitation or period in this Act, except as otherwise provided by any other act of the 77th General Assembly.

“SECTION 9.

To the extent possible, Arkansas Code of 1987, title 1, shall apply to this Act.

“SECTION 10.

Notwithstanding Arkansas Code §25-18-205, this Act shall not be printed or included in the Acts of Arkansas.

“SECTION 11.

This act shall be effective after midnight, June 30, 1989.

“SECTION 12.

The following sections, subsections, and subdivisions amend and are incorporated in and made part of the Arkansas Code of 1987. Where appropriate, they replace the particular chapters, subchapters, sections, subsections, and subdivisions to which they refer.”

Publisher's Notes.

Sections 1-2-101 through 1-2-118 were drafted by the Arkansas Code Revision Commission and enacted pursuant to Acts 1987, No. 267, § 1, which adopted the Arkansas Code of 1987 Annotated and incorporated it by reference.

Preambles.

Acts 1981, No. 308 contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas, a large percentage of the laws enacted by the Arkansas General Assembly at each session are so detailed and complicated and couched in such legal language that they are incomprehensible to the average citizen; and

“Whereas, simplification of the language and structure of bills considered and acts passed by the General Assembly would not only be beneficial to the citizens of the State but would reduce the time required to be spent by members of the General Assembly in analyzing the many bills considered each session; and

“Whereas, if laws were written in language which could be understood by the average person the expense to the citizens of Arkansas for employment of legal assistance to interpret laws and to represent such citizens in court to obtain their rights under such laws would be substantially reduced,

“Now therefore … .”

Effective Dates.

Acts 1846, p. 93, § 1: effective on passage.

Acts 2003, No. 623, § 2: Mar. 24, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Arkansas Code Revision Commission has contracted for an official electronic version of the Arkansas Code and an official hard copy version of the Arkansas Code; that in some instances it has been discovered that the official electronic version differs from the official hard copy version; that the issue as to which official version takes precedence is a matter within the jurisdiction of the General Assembly to decide; that this act provides that the official hard copy version takes precedence over the official electronic version; and that until this act goes into effect, confusion will exist as to which version takes precedence. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2007, No. 515, § 2: Mar. 28, 2007. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that persons with disabilities and their families should be provided with meaningful opportunities to contribute their perspectives through their experiences concerning issues relating to services, support, and standards that ultimately affect them; that they are at risk every day that their needs and aspirations go unheard. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

1-2-101. Legislative intent of Code.

(a)

It is the intent of the General Assembly that this Code, the Arkansas Code of 1987 Annotated, be a recodification, revision, modernization, and reenactment of the laws of Arkansas of a general and permanent nature which are currently in force.

(b)

It is the intent of the General Assembly that this Code resolve conflicts which exist in the laws and to repeal those laws which:

(1)

Are obsolete as a result of the passage of time or other causes;

(2)

Have been declared unconstitutional or invalid; or

(3)

Have been superseded by the enactment of later laws.

(c)

Except as otherwise specifically provided, the enactment of this Code by the General Assembly is not intended to alter the substantive law in existence on the effective date of this Code. It is not the purpose of the enactment of this Code to change or alter the effect of any law in existence on December 31, 1987.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 267, § 1.

1-2-102. Enactment of Code.

(a)

The statutory portion of the codification of Arkansas laws prepared by the Arkansas Code Revision Commission and the Michie Company pursuant to a contract entered into on August 1, 1984, is enacted and shall have the effect of statutes enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas.

(b)

The statutory portion of the codification shall be merged with annotations, captions, catchlines, history lines, editorial notes, cross references, indices, title, chapter, and subchapter analyses, and other materials pursuant to the contract and shall be published by authority of the state pursuant to the contract.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 267, § 1.

1-2-103. Repeal of prior laws by Code — Exceptions.

(a)

All acts, codes, and statutes, and all parts of them and all amendments to them of a general and permanent nature in effect on December 31, 1987, are repealed unless:

(1)

Expressly continued by specific provision of this Code;

(2)

Omitted improperly or erroneously as a consequence of compilation, revision, or both, of the laws enacted prior to this Code, including, without limitation, any omissions that may have occurred during the compilation, revision, or both, of the laws composing this Code; or

(3)

Omitted, changed, or modified by the Arkansas Code Revision Commission, or its predecessors, in a manner not authorized by the laws or the constitutions of Arkansas in effect at the time of the omission, change, or modification.

(b)

In the event one of the above exceptions should be applicable, the law as it existed on December 31, 1987, shall continue to be valid, effective, and controlling.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 267, § 4.

1-2-104. Omission of validating and curative acts from Code.

The omission from this Code of any act or section or part of a section of an act passed prior to the adoption of this Code shall in no way operate or be construed to repeal or destroy the effect of any act or section or part of a section where the act or section or part of a section has been otherwise lawfully passed, is not in conflict with the United States Constitution or the Arkansas Constitution of 1874, and:

(1)

Validates any bonds, notes, warrants, certificates, or other evidences of indebtedness issued by any officer, political subdivision, or instrumentality of this state;

(2)

Validates any action or cures any defect of any action of any public officer, political subdivision, or instrumentality of this state;

(3)

Cures any defect in any title to property; or

(4)

Validates any action or cures any defect in any action of any person, natural or artificial, public or private.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 267, § 1.

1-2-105. Adoption of Code not to affect certain acts.

The adoption of this Code shall not be construed to repeal any act or section or part of a section of an act in effect on December 31, 1987, and omitted from this Code, which:

(1)

Is of a local or special nature;

(2)

Relates to or applies to only one (1) county, municipality, political subdivision, district, or territory;

(3)

Applies to one (1) or more counties, municipalities, political subdivisions, districts, or territories on the basis of population;

(4)

Applies to one (1) or more counties, municipalities, political subdivisions, districts, or territories on the basis of the number of counties, municipalities, political subdivisions, districts, or territories;

(5)

Applies to one (1) or more judicial districts or one (1) or more counties within a judicial district, whether by specific reference thereto or by some other method of identification or classification;

(6)

Establishes the amount or rate of salary or compensation of any state officer or employee or any other person whose salary or compensation is paid by this state, in whole or in part, or which establishes minimum or maximum amounts or sets specific amounts of salary or compensation or which provides additional compensation for the performance of specified services or duties; or

(7)

Appropriates funds from any source.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 267, § 1.

1-2-106. Adoption of Code not to validate constitutionally invalid acts.

The adoption of this Code shall not validate an act or validate any section or part of a section of an act, which act or section or part of a section of an act is constitutionally invalid.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 267, § 1.

1-2-107. Repealed acts not revived by Code.

All acts or parts of acts which are repealed or superseded by this Code or are repugnant to any act repealed by this Code and which have not been reenacted or consolidated shall continue to be so repealed or superseded.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 267, § 1.

1-2-108. Adoption of Code not to affect rules and regulations.

Unless otherwise provided, the adoption of this Code shall not invalidate or affect any rules or regulations which were in effect on December 31, 1987, promulgated pursuant to authority given by law. These rules and regulations shall remain in force until repealed, replaced, or invalidated.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 267, § 1.

1-2-109. Adoption of Code not to validate invalid, unauthorized, or defective rules and regulations.

The adoption of this Code shall not validate or authorize a rule or regulation, cure any defect in a rule or regulation, or validate, authorize, or cure any section or part of a section of any rule or regulation, which rule or regulation or section or part of a section of the rule or regulation is invalid, unauthorized, or defective.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 267, § 1.

1-2-110. Adoption of Code not to affect terms of office, compensation, expenses, etc.

(a)

The adoption of this Code shall not affect the term of office or the right to hold office of any person who is in office on December 31, 1987, unless otherwise expressly provided or unless the office is abolished by the adoption of this Code.

(b)

The adoption of this Code shall not affect the compensation, expenses, per diem, allowances, retirement, or other rights of any officer or employee of this state or of any county, municipality, district, improvement district, school district, institution of higher education, political subdivision, authority, or other governmental entity within this state, or of any agency, department, division, section, board, commission, committee, or council of any of the above, unless otherwise provided in this Code.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 267, § 1.

1-2-111. Adoption of Code not to affect existing rights, liabilities, contracts, actions, etc.

(a)

The adoption of this Code shall not affect or impair any existing right, remedy, or defense nor affect, impair, discharge, or release any existing contract, obligation, duty, or liability of any kind. It shall not affect any pending suit or action, or prosecution now commenced or which shall be hereafter commenced, for any offense committed prior to January 1, 1988. As to all such suits, actions, and prosecutions, the law in force on December 31, 1987, shall continue in force.

(b)

The repeal, repeal and reenactment, or the revision, amendment, or consolidation of any act, or of any section or part of a section of any act, civil or criminal, shall not release, extinguish, alter, modify, or change, in whole or in part, any penalty, forfeiture, or liability, either civil or criminal, which shall have been incurred under the act, section, or part thereof unless the repealing, repealing and reenacting, revising, amending, or consolidating act shall expressly so provide. The repealed, repealed and reenacted, revised, amended, or consolidated act, or any section or part of a section of that act, shall be treated and held as still remaining in force for the purpose of sustaining any and all suits, actions, or prosecutions, civil or criminal, for the enforcement of any penalty, forfeiture, or liability, as well as for the purpose of sustaining any judgment, decree, or order that can or may be rendered, entered, or made in such suits, actions, or prosecutions imposing, inflicting, or declaring a penalty, forfeiture, or liability.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 267, § 1.

1-2-112. Adoption of Code not to toll limitations.

When a limitation or period of time prescribed in any act in effect on December 31, 1987, for acquiring a right, barring a remedy, or for any other purpose has begun to run before January 1, 1988, and when a limitation or period of time is prescribed in this Code for acquiring the right, barring the remedy, or for any other purpose, then the time which has already run shall be deemed to be part of the time prescribed by the limitation or period in this Code.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 267, § 1.

1-2-113. Designation and citation of Code.

(a)

This codification of the laws of Arkansas, consisting of this title and the following titles, subtitles, chapters, subchapters, and sections, as amended from time to time, shall constitute and be known as the “Arkansas Code of 1987 Annotated”.

(b)

As used in acts and resolutions of the General Assembly, and within this Code, “Arkansas Code of 1987 Annotated”, “Arkansas Code of 1987”, “Arkansas Code Annotated”, “Arkansas Code”, “the Code”, or “this Code”, unless the context otherwise requires, shall be construed to refer to this enactment of the Arkansas Code of 1987 Annotated and amendments and revisions thereof and additions and supplements thereto.

(c)

Sections of the Code may be cited by the abbreviation “A.C.A.” followed by the number of the section. For example, this section would be cited as “A.C.A. §1-2-113”.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 267, § 1.

1-2-114. References to Code titles, subtitles, chapters, etc.

(a)

Unless the context otherwise requires, references in this Code to titles, subtitles, chapters, subchapters, or sections shall mean titles, subtitles, chapters, subchapters, or sections of this Code.

(b)

Unless the context otherwise requires, any reference in this Code or in any law of this state to another provision of this Code or the law of this state shall mean and be construed to refer to the Code or the law as it now or hereafter exists.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 267, § 1.

1-2-115. Code classification and organization not to be construed — Notes, headings, etc., not part of law.

(a)

The classification and organization of the titles, subtitles, chapters, subchapters, sections, subsections, and subdivisions of this Code, and any headings thereto, are made for the purpose of convenient reference and orderly arrangement, and no implication, inference, or presumption of a legislative construction shall be drawn therefrom.

(b)

Unless otherwise provided in this Code, title, chapter, and subchapter analyses, and the descriptive headings or catchlines immediately preceding or within the text of the individual sections of this Code, except the section numbers included in the headings or catchlines immediately preceding the text of the sections, do not constitute part of the law and shall in no manner limit or expand the construction of any section.

(c)

All title, chapter, and subchapter analyses, historical citations, annotations, and notes set out in this Code are given for the purpose of convenient reference and do not constitute part of the law.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 267, § 1.

1-2-116. Amendments to Code.

(a)

All acts enacted after December 31, 1987, of a general and permanent nature shall be enacted as amendments to this Code. No local, private, or temporary acts or provisions and no provisions appropriating funds shall be enacted as amendments to this Code. If the subject matter of any law is already generally embodied in one of the titles of this Code or can be appropriately classified therein, that new law shall be enacted as an amendment to that title of the Code. If it is not possible to classify the subject matter of a new law in an existing title, a new title shall be enacted containing the new law as a chapter or chapters, each chapter to contain a proper designation and descriptive name or heading, as provided in subsection (c) of this section.

(b)

A new title shall be created only as a last resort and only when it would be unreasonable to include the new law in an existing title. If a new title is created, it shall be given a name and a number sequentially following that of the last title number. New titles shall be given names which are broad and comprehensive in scope so that each will accommodate the greatest number of new laws having related subject matter.

(c)

The reserved sections, subchapters, chapters, and subtitles are for the purpose of accommodating future growth and expansion of the law, thereby permitting the insertion in the Code of new laws in their most logical positions with respect to existing related laws. When a new unit is enacted it shall be given a name, which shall be sufficiently broad and comprehensive to describe generally its subject matter, and a number designating its position within a title. The name is not to be confused with the title of a bill.

(d)

A unit should be repealed, as distinct from amended, when an outright repeal thereof is intended or when the subject matter of the proposed new law is more than a mere amendment or revision of the old unit.

(e)

When sections of this Code are amended, the descriptive headings or catchlines immediately preceding or within them need not be amended. When new sections are enacted, descriptive headings or catchlines need not be enacted to accompany them except that any desired changes in the section numbers contained in the headings or catchlines shall be made by specific statutory amendments of the numbers and new sections shall be assigned proper title section numbers by the law which enacts them.

(f)

In the enactment of new laws, the plan, scheme, style, format, arrangement, and classification of this Code shall be followed as closely as possible with the result that the Code and all amendments to it will compose a harmonious entity containing all the laws of the State of Arkansas of a general and permanent nature.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 267, § 1.

1-2-117. Severability of provisions of Code.

Except as otherwise specifically provided in this Code, in the event any title, subtitle, chapter, subchapter, section, subsection, subdivision, paragraph, subparagraph, item, sentence, clause, phrase, or word of this Code is declared or adjudged to be invalid or unconstitutional, such declaration or adjudication shall not affect the remaining portions of this Code which shall remain in full force and effect as if the portion so declared or adjudged invalid or unconstitutional was not originally a part of this Code.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 267, § 1.

1-2-118. Effective date of Code.

This Code is effective at midnight, December 31, 1987.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 267, § 1.

1-2-119. Common and statute law of England adopted.

The common law of England, so far as it is applicable and of a general nature, and all statutes of the British Parliament in aid of or to supply the defects of the common law made prior to March 24, 1606, which are applicable to our own form of government, of a general nature and not local to that kingdom, and not inconsistent with the United States Constitution and the laws of the United States or the Arkansas Constitution and laws of this state, shall be the rule of decision in this state unless altered or repealed by the General Assembly of this state.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 28, § 1; C. & M. Dig., § 1432; Pope's Dig., § 1679; A.S.A. 1947, § 1-101.

1-2-120. Effect of repeal of statute.

(a)

When a statute is repealed and the repealing statute is afterwards repealed, the first statute shall not thereby be revived unless by express words.

(b)

When any criminal or penal statute is repealed, all offenses committed or forfeitures accrued under it while it was in force shall be punished or enforced as if it were in force, notwithstanding the repeal, unless otherwise expressly provided in the repealing statute.

(c)

No action, plea, prosecution, or proceeding, civil or criminal, pending at the time any statutory provision is repealed shall be affected by the repeal but shall proceed in all respects as if the statutory provision had not been repealed.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 129, § 31; Rev. Stat., ch. 146, § 1; Acts 1846, § 1, p. 93; C. & M. Dig., §§ 9757-9759; Pope's Dig., §§ 13282-13284; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 1-102 — 1-104.

Cross References.

Effect of amendment or repeal of statute defining criminal offense, §5-1-103(e).

1-2-121. Bills and laws to be clear and unambiguous.

No bill shall be considered and no law enacted unless the bill or law is written in clear, unambiguous language.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 308, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 1-106.

1-2-122. Laws requiring use of registered mail — Alternative use of certified mail.

(a)

Anything permitted or required by the laws of this state to be served or transmitted by registered mail, except when required by any law promulgated by the National Conference of Commissioners on Uniform State Laws and referred to as a uniform state law, may be transmitted either by registered mail or by certified mail with return receipt requested, and return receipts for the delivery of certified mail shall be received in the courts as evidence of delivery to the same extent as return receipts for the delivery of registered mail.

(b)

When service of summons, process, or notice is provided for and permitted by registered or certified mail under the laws of Arkansas, delivery shall not be restricted to the United States Postal Service. It shall be deemed an actual and valid service of the summons, process, or notice when an alternative mail carrier delivers the summons, process, or notice by the same or similar process as required by law.

History.

Acts 1959, No. 255, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 1-105; Acts 1993, No. 269, § 1.

Publisher's Notes.

The January 24, 2002, amendments to Ark. R. Civ. P. 4(d)(8)(C) and Ark. R. Civ. P. 5(b) are deemed to supersede subsection (b) of this section with respect to the service of process and other papers. See Addition to Reporter's Notes, 2002 Amendment, at Ark. R. Civ. P. 4 and Ark. R. Civ. P. 5.

Cross References.

Notice — Knowledge, §4-1-202.

Service of notices, registered or certified mail, §16-55-115.

1-2-123. Official printed version of Code — Official electronic version of Code — Printed version to take precedence.

If the official electronic version of the Arkansas Code differs from the official hard copy version of the Arkansas Code, the hard copy version shall take precedence over the electronic version.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 623, § 1.

Publisher's Notes.

The Arkansas Code of 1987 Annotated, as published by LexisNexis, is the official version of the Arkansas Code.

1-2-124. Respectful language — Disabilities — Definition.

(a)(1)

The General Assembly recognizes that language used in reference to individuals with disabilities shapes and reflects society's attitudes toward people with disabilities. Many of the terms currently used demean the humanity and natural condition of having a disability. Certain terms are demeaning and create an invisible barrier to inclusion as equal community members.

(2)

The General Assembly finds it necessary to clarify preferred language for new and revised laws by requiring the use of terminology that puts the person before the disability.

(b)(1)

In any bill or resolution, the Bureau of Legislative Research shall avoid all references to:

(A)

“Disabled”;

(B)

“Developmentally disabled”;

(C)

“Mentally disabled”;

(D)

“Mentally ill”;

(E)

“Mentally retarded”;

(F)

“Handicapped”;

(G)

“Cripple”; and

(H)

“Crippled”.

(2)

The Arkansas Code Revision Commission shall change such references in any existing statute or resolution as sections including these references are republished or otherwise amended by law.

(3)

The Bureau of Legislative Research and the Arkansas Code Revision Commission shall replace the inappropriate terms in subdivision (b)(1) of this section with the following terms:

(A)

“Individuals with disabilities”;

(B)

“Individuals with developmental disabilities”;

(C)

“Individuals with mental illness”; and

(D)

“Individuals with intellectual disabilities”.

(c)(1)

In any administrative rule, a state agency shall avoid the inappropriate terms in subdivision (b)(1) of this section and shall use the terms in subdivision (b)(3) of this section.

(2)

If a state agency identifies a use of an inappropriate term under subdivision (b)(1) of this section in a rule, the state agency shall promulgate a revision to the rule to replace the inappropriate term with a term under subdivision (b)(3) of this section.

(3)

As used in this subsection, “state agency” means any office, board, commission, department, council, bureau, or other agency of state government having authority by statute enacted by the General Assembly to promulgate or enforce administrative rules.

(d)

A statute, resolution, or rule is not invalid because it does not comply with this section.

History.

Acts 2007, No. 515, § 1; 2009, No. 975, § 1; 2011, No. 98, § 1; 2019, No. 377, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment deleted (b)(3)(D); redesignated former (b)(3)(E) as (b)(3)(D); and made related changes.

The 2011 amendment added (c) and redesignated former (c) as (d); and substituted “resolution, or rule” for “or resolution” in present (d).

The 2019 amendment deleted former (c)(2) and (c)(4) and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly.

1-2-125. Electronic document submissions and publications.

(a)(1)

A state agency, a court, or a local government entity that is required by law to accept, solicit, or publish any information, record, report, application, or other required material may accept, solicit, or publish the information, record, report, application, or other required material in an electronic form.

(2)

If a state agency, a court, or a local government entity accepts, solicits, or publishes the information, record, report, application, or other required material in an electronic form under subdivision (a)(1) of this section, the state agency, the court, or the local government entity shall also comply with existing requirements in law concerning the acceptance, solicitation, or publication of information, records, reports, applications, or other required materials.

(3)

A state agency, a court, or a local government entity may require an electronic form of receipt verification of information, records, reports, applications, or other required materials accepted, solicited, or published in an electronic form.

(b)

If as provided by this section, a state agency, a court, or a local government entity decides to accept, solicit, or publish the information, record, report, application, or other required material in an electronic form, the state agency, the court, or the local government entity shall:

(1)

Notify the Legislative Council within thirty (30) days of its decision and the justifications for the decision; and

(2)

On or before the expiration date of this section, advise the Legislative Council as to the sections of the Arkansas Code that should be amended to allow indefinitely for the discretion to accept, solicit, or publish the information, records, report, application, or other required material in an electronic form.

(c)

This section expires four (4) years after August 1, 2017.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 960, § 1.

Subchapter 2

— Construction

Effective Dates.

Acts 1993, No. 1167, § 6: Apr. 15, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that it is not uncommon that multiple acts are enacted each session by the General Assembly dealing with the same subject matter; that it is unclear as to which law prevails in that instance; this act establishes rules of construction to clarify the confusion and should therefore be given immediate effect. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

1-2-201. Applicability of §§ 1-2-202 and 1-2-203.

The rules prescribed in §§1-2-202 and1-2-203 shall apply in all cases, both civil and criminal, unless it is otherwise specially provided or unless there is something in the context or subject matter repugnant to that construction.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 129, § 23; C. & M. Dig., § 9729; Pope's Dig., § 13255; A.S.A. 1947, § 1-204.

1-2-202. Liberal construction.

All general provisions, terms, phrases, and expressions used in any statute shall be liberally construed in order that the true intent and meaning of the General Assembly may be fully carried out.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 129, § 22; C. & M. Dig., § 9728; Pope's Dig., § 13254; A.S.A. 1947, § 1-203.

1-2-203. Words importing number and gender.

(a)

When any subject matter, party, or person is described or referred to by words importing the singular number or the masculine gender, several matters and persons, and females as well as males, and bodies corporate as well as individuals, shall be deemed to be included.

(b)

Whenever, in any statute, words importing the plural number are used in describing or referring to any matter, parties, or persons, any single matter, party, or person shall be deemed to be included, although distributive words may not be used.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 129, §§ 20, 21; C. & M. Dig., §§ 9726, 9727; Pope's Dig., §§ 13252, 13253; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 1-201, 1-202.

1-2-204. “Heretofore” and “hereafter”.

Whenever the term “heretofore” occurs in any statute, it shall be construed to mean any time previous to the day when the statute shall take effect. Whenever the term “hereafter” occurs, it shall be construed to mean the time after the statute containing the term shall take effect.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 129, § 19; A.S.A. 1947, § 1-206.

1-2-205. General severability.

The provisions of each and every act enacted by the General Assembly after July 24, 1973, are declared to be severable and, unless it is otherwise specifically provided in the particular act, the invalidity of any provision of that act shall not affect other provisions of the act which can be given effect without the invalid provision.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 92, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 1-207.

1-2-206. Effect of construction of statute by circuit court.

Whenever, by the decision of any circuit court, a construction may be given to any penal or other statute, every act done in good faith in conformity with that construction after the making of the decision, and before the reversal thereof by the Supreme Court of Arkansas, shall be so far valid that the party doing the act shall not be liable to any penalty or forfeiture for any act that shall have been adjudged lawful by the decision of the circuit court.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 117, § 40; C. & M. Dig., § 9731; Pope's Dig., § 13257; A.S.A. 1947, § 1-205.